Maryland, session 2025, SB0741.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Procedure
3–106.
(c) (4) (I) [If] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH, IF the Health Department fails to admit a defendant to a designated health
care facility within the time period specified in paragraph (2)(i) of this subsection, the court
may impose any sanction reasonably designed to compel compliance, including requiring
the Health Department to reimburse a detention facility for expenses and costs incurred in
retaining the defendant beyond the time period specified in paragraph (2)(i) of this
subsection at the daily rate specified in § 9–402(b) of the Correctional Services Article.
(II) IF THE SANCTION IMPOSED BY THE COURT INCLUDES A FINE
OR MONETARY PENALTY THAT IS NOT INTENDED TO REIMBURSE A DETENTION
FACILITY, THE COURT SHALL REMIT THE FINE OR MONETARY PENALTY TO THE
FORENSIC MENTAL HEALTH TREATMENT FUND ESTABLISHED UNDER § 24–2502 OF
THE HEALTH – GENERAL ARTICLE.
Article – Health – General
19–120.
(h) (1) A certificate of need is required before the bed capacity of a health care
facility is changed.

SENATE BILL 741 3
(2) [This] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, THIS subsection does not apply to any increase or decrease in bed capacity
if:
(i) For a health care facility that is not a hospital, during a 2–year
period the increase or decrease would not exceed the lesser of 10 percent of the total bed
capacity or 10 beds;
(ii) 1. The increase or decrease would change the bed capacity
for an existing medical service; and
2. A. The change would not increase total bed capacity;
B. The change is maintained for at least a 1–year period; and
C. At least 45 days prior to the change, the hospital provides
written notice to the Commission describing the change and providing an updated
inventory of the hospital’s licensed bed complement;
(iii) 1. At least 45 days before increasing or decreasing bed
capacity, written notice of intent to change bed capacity is filed with the Commission;
2. The Commission in its sole discretion finds that the
proposed change:
A. Is pursuant to the consolidation or merger of two or more
health care facilities, or conversion of a health care facility or part of a facility to a
nonhealth–related use;
B. Is not inconsistent with the State health plan or the
institution–specific plan developed by the Commission;
C. Will result in the delivery of more efficient and effective
health care services; and
D. Is in the public interest; and
3. Within 45 days of receiving notice, the Commission
notifies the health care facility of its finding;
(iv) The increase or decrease in bed capacity is the result of the
annual licensed bed recalculation provided under § 19–307.2 of this title; or
(v) 1. The increase or decrease in bed capacity will occur in:

SENATE BILL 741
A. An intermediate care facility that offers residential or
intensive substance–related disorder treatment services and has a current license issued
by the Secretary; or
B. An existing general hospice program that has a current
license issued by the Secretary; and
2. At least 45 days before increasing or decreasing bed
capacity, written notice of the intent to change bed capacity is filed with the Commission.
(3) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER REQUIREMENT OF THIS
SUBSECTION, A CERTIFICATE OF NEED IS REQUIRED BEFORE THE PSYCHIATRIC BED
CAPACITY OF A HEALTH CARE FACILITY IS REDUCED BY FIVE OR MORE BEDS.
(l) (1) [A] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (7) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, A certificate of need is not required to close any health care facility or part
of a health care facility if at least 90 days before the closing or if at least 45 days before the
partial closing of the health care facility, including a State hospital, a person proposing to
close all or part of the health care facility files notice of the proposed closing or partial
closing with the Commission.
(2) A hospital shall hold a public informational hearing in the county where
the hospital is located if the hospital:
(i) Files a notice of the proposed closing of the hospital with the
Commission;
(ii) Requests an exemption from the Commission under subsection
(o)(3) of this section to convert to a freestanding medical facility; or
(iii) Is located in a county with fewer than three hospitals and files a
notice of the partial closing of the hospital with the Commission.
(3) The Commission may require a health care facility other than a hospital
described in paragraph (2) of this subsection that files notice of its proposed closing or
partial closing to hold a public informational hearing in the county where the health care
facility is located.
(4) A public informational hearing required under paragraph (2) or (3) of
this subsection shall be held by the health care facility, in consultation with the
Commission, within 30 days after:
(i) The health care facility files with the Commission a notice of its
proposed closing or partial closing; or
(ii) The hospital files with the Commission a notice of intent to
convert to a freestanding medical facility.

SENATE BILL 741 5
(5) (i) The Commission shall establish by regulation requirements for
a public informational hearing required under paragraph (2) or (3) of this subsection.
(ii) For a hospital proposing to close, partially close, or convert to a
freestanding medical facility, the regulations shall require the hospital to address:
1. The reasons for the closure, partial closure, or conversion;
2. The plan for transitioning acute care services previously
provided by the hospital to residents of the hospital service area;
3. The plan for addressing the health care needs of the
residents of the hospital service area;
4. The plan for retraining and placing displaced employees;
5. The plan for the hospital’s physical plant and site; and
6. The proposed timeline for the closure, partial closure, or
conversion to a freestanding medical facility.
(6) Within 10 working days after a public informational hearing held by a
hospital under this subsection, the hospital shall provide a written summary of the hearing
to:
(i) The Governor;
(ii) The Secretary;
(iii) The governing body of the county in which the hospital is located;
(iv) The local health department and the local board of health or
similar body for the county in which the hospital is located;
(v) The Commission; and
(vi) Subject to § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, the Senate
Finance Committee, the House Health and Government Operations Committee, and the
members of the General Assembly who represent the district in which the hospital is
located.
(7) A CERTIFICATE OF NEED IS REQUIRED IF THE CLOSING OR
PARTIAL CLOSING OF THE HEALTH CARE FACILITY WILL RESULT IN A DECREASE OF
FIVE OR MORE PSYCHIATRIC BEDS IN THE STATE.
SUBTITLE 25. FORENSIC MENTAL HEALTH TREATMENT.

SENATE BILL 741
24–2501.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “WORKGROUP” MEANS THE WORKGROUP ON
FORENSIC MENTAL HEALTH TREATMENT.
(B) THERE IS A WORKGROUP ON FORENSIC MENTAL HEALTH TREATMENT.
(C) THE WORKGROUP CONSISTS OF:
(1) THE SECRETARY, OR THE SECRETARY’S DESIGNEE;
(2) THE CHIEF JUSTICE OF THE SUPREME COURT OF MARYLAND;
(3) ONE CIRCUIT COURT JUDGE, APPOINTED BY THE CHIEF JUSTICE
OF THE SUPREME COURT OF MARYLAND;
(4) ONE REPRESENTATIVE OF THE MENTAL HEALTH DIVISION OF
THE OFFICE OF THE PUBLIC DEFENDER, APPOINTED BY THE PUBLIC DEFENDER
OF MARYLAND;
(5) THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR OF THE MARYLAND HEALTH CARE
COMMISSION, OR THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR’S DESIGNEE;
(6) THE PRESIDENT OF THE MARYLAND STATE’S ATTORNEYS’
ASSOCIATION, OR THE PRESIDENT’S DESIGNEE;
(7) THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR OF ON OUR OWN OF MARYLAND, OR
THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR’S DESIGNEE; AND
(8) THE PRESIDENT OF DISABILITY RIGHTS MARYLAND, OR THE
PRESIDENT’S DESIGNEE.
(D) THE SECRETARY AND THE CHIEF JUSTICE OF THE MARYLAND
SUPREME COURT SHALL COCHAIR THE WORKGROUP.
(E) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PROVIDE STAFF FOR THE WORKGROUP.
(F) A MEMBER OF THE WORKGROUP:
(1) MAY NOT RECEIVE COMPENSATION AS A MEMBER OF THE
WORKGROUP; BUT

SENATE BILL 741 7
(2) IS ENTITLED TO REIMBURSEMENT FOR EXPENSES UNDER THE
STANDARD STATE TRAVEL REGULATIONS, AS PROVIDED IN THE STATE BUDGET.

(G) (1) ON OR BEFORE OCTOBER 1, 2026, THE SECRETARY AND CHIEF
JUSTICE SHALL JOINTLY CREATE, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE WORKGROUP, A
DATA COLLECTION FORM FOR USE BY JUDGES IN A PROCEEDING RELATED TO
INCOMPETENCY TO STAND TRIAL.
(2) THE FORM SHALL INCLUDE:
(I) THE JUDGE PRESIDING OVER THE PROCEEDING;
(II) THE EVALUATOR WORKING ON BEHALF OF THE
DEPARTMENT WHO EXAMINED THE DEFENDANT AS PART OF THE INCOMPETENCY
PROCEEDINGS;
(III) THE CHARGES BROUGHT AGAINST THE DEFENDANT;
(IV) THE EVALUATOR’S OPINION ON THE DEFENDANT’S
COMPETENCY AND DANGEROUSNESS UNDER § 3–105 OF THE CRIMINAL
PROCEDURE ARTICLE;
(V) THE POSITION TAKEN BY THE STATE’S ATTORNEY AND
COUNSEL FOR THE DEFENDANT ON THE DEFENDANT’S COMPETENCY OR
DANGEROUSNESS;
(VI) THE COURT’S DECISION ON THE COMPETENCY AND
DANGEROUSNESS OF THE DEFENDANT;
(VII) IF THE COURT FOUND THE DEFENDANT INCOMPETENT,
WHETHER THE COURT ORDERED THE DEFENDANT TO BE COMMITTED TO A FACILITY
DESIGNATED BY THE DEPARTMENT OR THAT THE DEFENDANT BE RELEASED; AND
(VIII) ANY OTHER INFORMATION IDENTIFIED BY THE SECRETARY
AND CHIEF JUSTICE.
(H) FOLLOWING THE CREATION OF THE FORM UNDER SUBSECTION (G) OF
THIS SECTION, THE CHIEF JUSTICE SHALL DIRECT THE COURTS TO:
(1) COMPLETE THE FORM FOLLOWING A PROCEEDING RELATED TO
INCOMPETENCY TO STAND TRIAL; AND
(2) SUBMIT THE FORM TO THE DEPARTMENT.

SENATE BILL 741
(I) THE WORKGROUP SHALL MEET AT LEAST ANNUALLY TO REVIEW DATA
COLLECTED FROM THE SUBMITTED FORMS AND ANY OTHER RELEVANT
INFORMATION.
(J) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1 EACH YEAR, BEGINNING IN 2027, THE
WORKGROUP SHALL SUBMIT A REPORT TO THE GOVERNOR AND, IN ACCORDANCE
WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
ON:
(1) THE DATA COLLECTED USING THE FORMS SUBMITTED UNDER
SUBSECTION (G) OF THIS SECTION;
(2) THE NEED FOR MORE PSYCHIATRIC BEDS IN THE STATE;
(3) THE NEED FOR INCREASED OUTPATIENT COMPETENCY
RESTORATION OPTIONS;
(4) FUNDING RECOMMENDATIONS RELATED TO PARAGRAPHS (2)
AND (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION; AND
(5) ANY OTHER FINDINGS OR RECOMMENDATIONS.
(K) THE WORKGROUP AND THE DEPARTMENT SHALL TAKE APPROPRIATE
PRECAUTIONS TO PROTECT THE IDENTITY OF A JUDGE, AN EVALUATOR, AND A
DEFENDANT INCLUDED ON A FORM COMPLETED UNDER SUBSECTION (H) OF THIS
SECTION.
24–2502.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “FUND” MEANS THE FORENSIC MENTAL HEALTH
TREATMENT FUND.
(B) THERE IS A FORENSIC MENTAL HEALTH TREATMENT FUND IN THE
DEPARTMENT.
(C) (1) THE COMPTROLLER SHALL COLLECT ALL FINES AND MONETARY
PENALTIES REMITTED TO THE FUND BY THE COURTS UNDER § 3–106 OF THE
CRIMINAL PROCEDURE ARTICLE.
(2) THE COMPTROLLER SHALL DISTRIBUTE THE FINES AND
MONETARY PENALTIES TO THE FUND.

SENATE BILL 741 9
(D) THE PURPOSE OF THE FUND IS TO PROVIDE SUPPORT FOR INCREASING
THE TOTAL NUMBER OF LICENSED PSYCHIATRIC BEDS IN THE STATE.
(E) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADMINISTER THE FUND.
(F) (1) THE FUND IS A SPECIAL, NONLAPSING FUND THAT IS NOT
SUBJECT TO § 7–302 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.
(2) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL HOLD THE FUND SEPARATELY,
AND THE COMPTROLLER SHALL ACCOUNT FOR THE FUND.
(G) THE FUND CONSISTS OF:
(1) FINES AND MONETARY PENALTIES DISTRIBUTED TO THE FUND
UNDER SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION;
(2) MONEY APPROPRIATED IN THE STATE BUDGET TO THE FUND;
(3) INTEREST EARNINGS; AND
(4) ANY OTHER MONEY FROM ANY OTHER SOURCE ACCEPTED FOR
THE BENEFIT OF THE FUND.
(H) THE FUND MAY BE USED ONLY FOR PURPOSES DESIGNED TO INCREASE
THE TOTAL NUMBER OF LICENSED PSYCHIATRIC BEDS IN THE STATE.
(I) (1) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL INVEST THE MONEY OF THE FUND
IN THE SAME MANNER AS OTHER STATE MONEY MAY BE INVESTED.
(2) ANY INTEREST EARNINGS OF THE FUND SHALL BE CREDITED TO
THE FUND.
(J) EXPENDITURES FROM THE FUND MAY BE MADE ONLY IN ACCORDANCE
WITH THE STATE BUDGET.
(K) MONEY EXPENDED FROM THE FUND IS SUPPLEMENTAL TO AND IS NOT
INTENDED TO TAKE THE PLACE OF FUNDING THAT OTHERWISE WOULD BE
APPROPRIATED FOR INCREASING THE TOTAL NUMBER OF LICENSED PSYCHIATRIC
BEDS IN THE STATE.
(L) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS ON THE DISTRIBUTION
OF FUNDS FROM THE FORENSIC MENTAL HEALTH TREATMENT FUND.
Article – State Finance and Procurement

SENATE BILL 741
6–226.
(a) (2) (i) 1. This subparagraph does not apply in fiscal years 2024
through 2028.
2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and unless
inconsistent with a federal law, grant agreement, or other federal requirement or with the
terms of a gift or settlement agreement, net interest on all State money allocated by the
State Treasurer under this section to special funds or accounts, and otherwise entitled to
receive interest earnings, as accounted for by the Comptroller, shall accrue to the General
Fund of the State.
(ii) The provisions of subparagraph (i) of this paragraph do not apply
to the following funds:
204. the Victims of Domestic Violence Program Grant Fund;
[and]
205. the Proposed Programs Collaborative Grant Fund; AND
206. THE FORENSIC MENTAL HEALTH TREATMENT FUND.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.